Tennessee, session 114, HB1792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
67-6-359.
There is exempt from the state tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of food
and food ingredients that are voucher-eligible under the Special Supplemental Food
Program for Women, Infants, and Children (42 U.S.C. § 1786), and any subsequent
federal legislation. Unless exempted pursuant to § 67-6-702(a)(1)(B) and
notwithstanding § 67-6-702(a) to the contrary, such food and food ingredients remain
taxable under part 7 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1792
009223
- 1 -